Hawaii, session 2025, HB1178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding two new sections to part II, subpart C, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     Cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external defibrillators; training.  (a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the department of education shall establish a cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external defibrillator training program using a program that: (1)  Has been developed by the American Heart Association or American Red Cross or is a nationally recognized cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external defibrillator training program; and (2)  Is based on the most current, national, evidence-based, emergency cardiovascular care guidelines for the performance of cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of an automated external defibrillator. (b)  The cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external defibrillator training program shall: (1)  Be conducted in all public middle, intermediate, and high schools in the State and made available to all students in grades six through twelve; and (2)  Be incorporated as an activity within the school's existing health or physical education curriculum. (c)  The training program shall include hands-on practicing of cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external defibrillator use. (d)  All courses taught pursuant to this section that result in certification shall be taught by a certified cardiopulmonary resuscitation or automated external defibrillator instructor; provided that a certified cardiopulmonary resuscitation or automated external defibrillator instructor shall not be required to facilitate or oversee the instruction of any course taught pursuant to this section that does not result in certification. (e)  A public middle, intermediate, or high school may waive the requirement for instruction pursuant to this section for any student who is unable to participate in hands-on practicing of cardiopulmonary resuscitation or the operation of an automated external defibrillator by reason of disability. (f)  Neither the department nor any of its agencies, boards, members, personnel, designees, agents, contractors, or volunteers shall be liable in civil damages to any party for any act or omission of any act relating to the provision of, participation in, or implementation of the components of the training program or protocol required by this section unless that act or omission amounts to gross negligence, wilful and wanton conduct, or intentional wrongdoing. §302A-     Cardiac emergency response plan; establishment.  (a)  Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each public elementary, middle, intermediate, and high school in the State shall establish a cardiac emergency response plan that establishes specific steps necessary to reduce death from cardiac arrest. (b)  The cardiac emergency response plan shall include evidence-based standards and core elements that are nationally recognized, evidence-based standards and core elements or have been developed by the American Heart Association.  The cardiac emergency response plan shall include, at minimum, the following core elements: (1)  Establishment of a cardiac emergency response team; (2)  Activation of a cardiac emergency response team in response to a sudden cardiac event; (3)  Placement and routine maintenance of automated external defibrillators on school grounds; (4)  Identification of staff to receive initial and ongoing training in first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and automated external defibrillator use; provided that: (A)  Appropriate staff includes but is not limited to school nurses, coaches, and athletic trainers; and (B)  The training shall follow evidence-based guidelines established by the American Heart Association or other national recognized evidence-based emergency care guidelines; (5)  Practice drills, including the use of applicable equipment; and (6)  The appropriate use of school personnel to respond to incidents involving an individual experiencing sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life-threating cardiac emergency while on school grounds. (c)  The cardiac emergency response plan shall be provided to all teachers and shall be prominently placed at appropriate locations throughout the school campus. (d)  School officials shall work directly with local emergency service providers to integrate the cardiac emergency plan with the appropriate emergency medical service." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________